Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 7. Travel Ways and Loading and Haulage Areas.

§ 45.2-922.
Stairways, platforms, runways, and floor openings.

Stairways, platforms, and runways shall be provided where persons work or travel.

Stairways, elevated platforms, elevated runways, and floor openings shall be equipped with suitable handrails or guardrails.

Stairways, elevated platforms, runways, and floor openings shall be provided with toe boards. Stairways, platforms, and runways shall be kept clear of stumbling and slipping hazards and shall be maintained in good repair.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-36; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.275; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-923.
Loading and haulage work area requirements.

Every ramp or dump shall be of solid construction, ample width, and ample clearance, and headroom shall be kept reasonably free of spillage.

Berms or guards shall be provided on the outer bank of every elevated haulage road. Every berm shall be constructed of substantial material to the mid-axle height of the largest vehicle regularly used on such haulage road. The width and height of the berm shall be constructed on a two-to-one ratio when it is constructed of unconsolidated material. Other equally effective and appropriate methods may be used for berms.

Berms, bumper blocks, safety hooks, or similar means shall be provided to prevent overtravel and overturning at dumping stations.

Dumping locations and haulage roads shall be kept reasonably free of water, debris, and spillage. Water, debris, or spilled material that creates a hazard to moving equipment shall be removed.

Every haulage road constructed on or after July 1, 2005, shall be constructed at least one and one-half times the width of the widest equipment in use, and any haulage road that is used for passing shall be constructed at least three times the width of the widest equipment in use. In any area in which it is not possible to construct the haulage road to at least the applicable minimum width, the foreman shall establish procedures for safe travel of haulage vehicles.

Traffic rules, signals, and warning signs shall be standardized at each mine and shall be posted. Such rules, signals, and signs shall include rules for the travel of on-road vehicles operating near off-road haulers in work areas.

Every dumping station at which material is dumped over an embankment shall be designed to minimize backing and, where conditions permit, to provide for perpendicular travel to allow the equipment operator to observe the dumping station for changing conditions prior to backing. Reflectorized signs, strobe lights, or other available means shall be used to clearly indicate each dumping location. This subsection shall not apply to a dumping station (i) that is moved after each dumped load as mining progresses, (ii) where spotters are being used, or (iii) where loads are dumped short and pushed over the embankment. Any dumping station that could interfere with a haulage road or work area below shall be clearly marked with signs to prevent further dumping, unless other effective precautions are taken to protect such haulage road or work area below the dump station.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-85.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-36; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.276; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2010, cc. 809, 857; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-924.
Equipment operation.

If a truck spotter is used, he shall be well in the clear while any truck is backing into dumping position and dumping. Every truck spotter shall use lights at night to direct backing and dumping operations.

Every dipper, bucket, scraper blade, or similar movable part shall be secured or lowered to the ground when not in use.

Equipment that is to be hauled shall be loaded and protected so as to prevent sliding or spillage. When moving between work areas, the equipment shall be secured in the travel position.

Tow bars shall be used to tow heavy equipment and a safety chain shall be used in conjunction with each tow bar.

Dust control measures shall be taken so as to prevent the obstruction of visibility of any equipment operator.

No dipper, bucket, loading boom, or other heavy load shall be swung over the cab of haulage equipment until the driver is out of the cab and in a safe location, unless the equipment is designed specifically to protect the driver from falling material.

Lights, flares, or other warning devices shall be posted when parked equipment creates a hazard for other vehicles.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.277; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”